Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 5. Wills, Will Contracts, and Custody and Deposit of Wills.

Cross references. —

For “living wills” (advance health care directives), see AS 13.52.

Sec. 13.12.501.
Who may make will.

An individual 18 or more years of age who is of sound mind may make a will.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.502.
Execution; witnessed wills; holographic wills.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, AS

13.06.068

, AS

13.12.506

, and

13.12.513

, a will must be

in writing;

signed by the testator or in the testator’s name by another individual in the testator’s conscious presence and by the testator’s direction; and

signed by at least two individuals, each of whom signs within a reasonable time after the witness witnesses either the signing of the will as described in (2) of this subsection or the testator’s acknowledgment of that signature or the will.

Except as provided in AS

13.06.068

, a will that does not comply with (a) of this section is valid as a holographic will, whether or not witnessed, if the signature and material portions of the document are in the testator’s handwriting.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For a temporary provision allowing witnessing by videoconference of a will signing during the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared on March 11, 2020, see § 25, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 13.12.504.
Self-proved will.

A will may be simultaneously executed, attested, and made self-proved, by acknowledgment of the will by the testator and affidavits of the witnesses, each made before an officer authorized to administer oaths under the laws of the state in which execution occurs and evidenced by the officer’s certificate, under official seal, in substantially the following form:

An attested will may be made self-proved at any time after its execution by the acknowledgment of the will by the testator and the affidavits of the witnesses, each made before an officer authorized to administer oaths under the laws of the state in which the acknowledgment occurs and evidenced by the officer’s certificate, under the official seal, attached or annexed to the will in substantially the following form:

A signature affixed to a self-proving affidavit attached to a will is considered a signature affixed to the will, if necessary to prove the will’s due execution.

I, , the testator, sign my name to this instrument this day of , and being first duly sworn, do hereby declare to the undersigned authority that I sign and execute this instrument as my will and that I sign it willingly (or willingly direct another to sign for me), that I execute it as my free and voluntary act for the purposes expressed in the will, and that I am eighteen years of age or older, of sound mind, and under no constraint or undue influence. Testator We, , , the witnesses, sign our names to this instrument, being first duly sworn, and do hereby declare to the undersigned authority that the testator signs and executes this instrument as the testator’s will and that the testator signs it willingly (or willingly directs another to sign for the testator), and that each of us, in the presence and hearing of the testator, hereby signs this will as witness to the testator’s signing, and that to the best of our knowledge the testator is eighteen years of age or older, of sound mind, and under no constraint or undue influence. Witness Witness State of Judicial District Subscribed, sworn to, and acknowledged before me by , the testator, and subscribed and sworn to before me by , and , witness, this day of . (Seal) (Signed) (Official capacity of officer)

Click to view

State of Judicial District We, , , and , the testator and the witnesses, respectively, whose names are signed to the attached or foregoing instrument, being first duly sworn, do hereby declare to the undersigned authority that the testator signed and executed the instrument as the testator’s will and that the testator had signed willingly (or willingly directed another to sign for the testator), and that the testator executed it as the testator’s free and voluntary act for the purposes expressed in the will, and that each of the witnesses, in the presence and hearing of the testator, signed the will as witness and that to the best of the witnesses’ knowledge the testator was at that time eighteen years of age or older, of sound mind, and under no constraint or undue influence. Testator Witness Witness Subscribed, sworn to and acknowledged before me by , the testator, and subscribed and sworn to before me by , and , witnesses, this day of . (Seal) (Signed) (Official capacity of officer)

Click to view

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.505.
Who may witness.

An individual generally competent to be a witness may act as a witness to a will.

The signing of a will by an interested witness does not invalidate the will or a provision of it.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Collateral references. —

79 Am. Jur. 2d, Wills, § 283 et seq.

94 C.J.S., Wills, §§ 182
—
197.

Competency of named executor as subscribing witness to will. 74 ALR2d 283.

Competency, as witness attesting will, of attorney named therein as executor’s attorney. 30 ALR3d 1361.

Necessity that attesting witness realize instrument was intended as will. 71 ALR3d 877.

Sec. 13.12.506.
Choice of law as to execution.

Except as provided by AS

13.06.068

, a written will is valid if executed in compliance with AS

13.12.502

or if its execution complies with the law at the time of execution of the place where the will is executed or of the law of the place where, at the time of execution or at the time of death, the testator is domiciled, has a place of abode, or is a national.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Sec. 13.12.507.
Revocation by writing or by act.

A will or a part of a will is revoked

by executing a subsequent will that revokes the previous will or part expressly or by inconsistency; or

by performing a revocatory act on the will, if the testator performed the act with the intent and for the purpose of revoking the will or part of the will or if another individual performed the act in the testator’s conscious presence and by the testator’s direction; in this paragraph, “revocatory act on the will” includes burning, tearing, canceling, obliterating, or destroying the will or any part of it; a “revocatory act on the will” includes a burning, tearing, or canceling whether or not the burn, tear, or cancellation touched any of the words on the will.

If a subsequent will does not expressly revoke a previous will, the execution of the subsequent will wholly revokes the previous will by inconsistency if the testator intended the subsequent will to replace rather than supplement the previous will.

The testator is presumed to have intended a subsequent will to replace rather than supplement a previous will if the subsequent will makes a complete disposition of the testator’s estate. If this presumption arises and is not rebutted by clear and convincing evidence, the previous will is revoked; only the subsequent will is operative on the testator’s death.

The testator is presumed to have intended a subsequent will to supplement rather than replace a previous will if the subsequent will does not make a complete disposition of the testator’s estate. If this presumption arises and is not rebutted by clear and convincing evidence, the subsequent will revokes the previous will only to the extent the subsequent will is inconsistent with the previous will; each will is fully operative on the testator’s death to the extent they are not inconsistent.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Collateral references. —

79 Am. Jur. 2d, Wills, § 498 et seq.

95 C.J.S., Wills, § 262 et seq.

Effect of testator’s attempted physical alteration of will after execution. 24 ALR2d 514.

Implied revocation of will by later will or codicil. 59 ALR2d 11.

Revocation of will as affecting codicil and vice versa. 7 ALR3d 1143.

Revocation of will by nontestamentary writing. 22 ALR3d 1346.

Admissibility of testator’s declarations on issue of revocation of will, in his possession at time of his death, by mutilation, alteration, or cancellation. 28 ALR3d 994.

Testator’s failure to make new will, following loss of original will by fire, theft, or similar casualty, as constituting revocation of original will. 61 ALR3d 958.

Lost instrument: revocation of prior will by revocation clause in lost will or other lost instrument. 31 ALR4th 306.

Sec. 13.12.508.
Revocation by change of circumstances.

Except as provided in AS

13.12.803

and

13.12.804

, a change of circumstances does not revoke a will or a part of it.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.509.
Revival of revoked will.

If a subsequent will that wholly revoked a previous will is thereafter revoked by a revocatory act under AS

13.12.507(a)(2)

, the previous will remains revoked unless it is revived. The previous will is revived if it is evident from the circumstances of the revocation of the subsequent will or from the testator’s contemporary or subsequent declarations that the testator intended the previous will to take effect as executed.

If a subsequent will that partly revoked a previous will is thereafter revoked by a revocatory act under AS

13.12.507(a)(2)

, a revoked part of the previous will is revived unless it is evident from the circumstances of the revocation of the subsequent will or from the testator’s contemporary or subsequent declarations that the testator did not intend the revoked part to take effect as executed.

If a subsequent will that revoked a previous will in whole or in part is thereafter revoked by another, later, will, the previous will remains revoked in whole or in part, unless it or its revoked part is revived. The previous will or its revoked part is revived to the extent it appears from the terms of the later will that the testator intended the previous will to take effect.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Collateral references. —

79 Am. Jur. 2d, Wills, § 684 et seq.

95 C.J.S., Wills, §§ 298
—
303.

Revocation of will as affecting codicil and vice versa. 7 ALR3d 1143.

Sec. 13.12.510.
Incorporation by reference.

A writing in existence when a will is executed may be incorporated by reference if the language of the will manifests this intent and describes the writing sufficiently to permit its identification.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.511.
Testamentary additions to trusts.

A will may validly devise property to the trustee of a trust established or to be established

during the testator’s lifetime by the testator, by the testator and some other person, or by some other person, including a funded or unfunded life insurance trust, although the settlor has reserved any or all rights of ownership of the insurance contracts; or

at the testator’s death by the testator’s devise to the trustee, if the trust is identified in the testator’s will and its terms are set out in a written instrument, other than a will, executed before, concurrently with, or after the execution of the testator’s will or in another individual’s will if that other individual has predeceased the testator, regardless of the existence, size, or character of the corpus of the trust.

A devise under (a) of this section is not invalid because the trust is amendable or revocable, or because the trust was amended after the execution of the will or the testator’s death.

Unless the testator’s will provides otherwise, property devised to a trust described in (a) — (b) of this section is not held under a testamentary trust of the testator, but it becomes a part of the trust to which it is devised, and must be administered and disposed of in accordance with the provisions of the governing instrument setting out the terms of the trust, including any amendments to the trust made before or after the testator’s death.

Unless the testator’s will provides otherwise, a revocation or termination of the trust before the testator’s death causes the devise to lapse.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.512.
Events of independent significance.

A will may dispose of property by reference to acts and events that have significance apart from their effect upon the dispositions made by the will, whether they occur before or after the execution of the will or before or after the testator’s death. The execution or revocation of another individual’s will is an event covered by this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.513.
Separate writing identifying devise of certain types of tangible personal property.

Whether or not the provisions relating to holographic wills apply, a will may refer to a written statement or list to dispose of items of tangible personal property not otherwise specifically disposed of by the will, other than money. To be admissible under this section as evidence of the intended disposition, the writing must be signed by the testator and must describe the items and the devisees with reasonable certainty. The writing may be referred to as one to be in existence at the time of the testator’s death; it may be prepared before or after the execution of the will; it may be altered by the testator after its preparation; and it may be a writing that does not have significance apart from its effect on the dispositions made by the will.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.514.
Contracts concerning succession.

A contract to make a will or devise, or not to revoke a will or devise, or to die intestate, if executed after January 1, 1997, may be established only by

provisions of a will stating material provisions of the contract;

an express reference in a will to a contract and extrinsic evidence proving the terms of the contract; or

a writing signed by the decedent evidencing the contract.

The execution of a joint will or mutual wills does not create a presumption of a contract not to revoke the will or wills.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.515.
Deposit of will with court in testator’s lifetime.

A will may be deposited by the testator or the testator’s agent with a court for safekeeping, under rules of the court. During the testator’s lifetime, the will must be kept confidential. During the testator’s lifetime, a deposited will shall be delivered only to the testator or to a person authorized in writing signed by the testator to receive the will. A conservator may be allowed to examine a deposited will of a protected testator under procedures designed to maintain the confidential character of the document to the extent possible, and to ensure that it will be kept confidential and on deposit after the examination.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.516.
Duty of custodian of will; liability.

After the death of a testator and on request of an interested person, a person having custody of a will of the testator shall deliver it with reasonable promptness to a person able to secure its probate and, if the person with custody does not know of a person able to secure the will’s probate, to an appropriate court. A person who wilfully fails to deliver a will is liable to a person aggrieved for any damages that may be sustained by the failure. A person who wilfully refuses or fails to deliver a will after being ordered by the court in a proceeding brought for the purpose of compelling delivery is subject to penalty for contempt of court.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.517.
Penalty clause for contest.

A provision in a will purporting to penalize an interested person for contesting the will or instituting other proceedings relating to the estate is unenforceable if probable cause exists for instituting proceedings.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)